Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
ARTICLE 5 COUNTY BOUNDARIES
30-5-163. San Juan.

The county of San Juan is hereby created and established, with the legal capacity and functions of the other counties of the state, and with boundaries as follows:

Commencing at a point on the western boundary of Hinsdale county, nine miles south of where it intersects the tenth correction line north; running thence due west to the western line of the state; thence north along such line to a point ten miles north of the thirty-eighth parallel of north latitude; thence east to a point on the summit of the main range of mountains, dividing the waters of the Uncompahgre and Animas rivers from the waters of the Lake Fork of the Gunnison; thence in a southerly direction along the summit of said range to a point at the head of the north fork of Pole creek; thence down said creek to the present boundary line between Hinsdale and La Plata counties; thence due south along said line to the place of beginning; and the boundary lines of La Plata and Hinsdale counties are hereby changed to correspond with the provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 1876:

p. 58, § 1.

G.L.

§ 384.

G.S.

§ 461.

R.S. 08:

§ 1142.

C.L.

§ 8626.

CSA:

C. 44, § 68.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-63.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-63.

30-5-164. San Miguel.

The county of San Miguel is hereby created and established, with the legal capacity and functions of other counties of this state, and with the boundaries as follows:

Commencing at a point on the boundary line between the counties of Hinsdale and San Juan, due east of the junction of Mineral creek and the main branch of the Uncompahgre river; thence due west through said junction to the summit of the divide between Red Mountain valley and Poughkeepsie gulch; thence southerly along said divide, to the divide between the waters of the Animas river and the Uncompahgre river; thence along the divide separating the waters of the Uncompahgre and San Miguel rivers on the north from those of Animas river on the south, to the north line of La Plata county; thence along the north line of said La Plata county to the western line of the state; thence north to the southwest corner of Lake county; thence east along the south line of Lake county to the western line of Hinsdale county; thence southerly along the western boundary of Hinsdale county to the place of beginning.

Source:

G.L.

§ 385.

G.S.

§ 462.

R.S. 08:

§ 1143.

C.L.

§ 8627.

CSA:

C. 44, § 69.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-64.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-64.

30-5-165. San Miguel and Dolores - boundary.

The boundary line between San Miguel and Dolores counties is hereby established as follows:

Commencing at the common section corner of sections twenty-seven, twenty-eight, thirty-three and thirty-four, township forty-one north, range nine west, New Mexico principal meridian, being the point of intersection of the said line with the west boundary line of the county of San Juan; thence north and west along the summit of the range dividing the waters of the San Miguel and Dolores rivers to the summit of Lone Cone mountain; thence northwesterly to the northeast corner of section twenty-three, township forty-two, north, range thirteen west New Mexico principal meridian; thence westerly following the section lines three miles north of the south boundary line of township forty-two to the west bank of the Dolores river on the boundary line between sections fourteen and twenty-three of said township forty-two north range eighteen west New Mexico principal meridian; thence south along the east boundary line of said section twenty-three to the southwest corner of said section twenty-three; thence west along the section lines two miles north of the south boundary of said township forty-two to the west boundary line of the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 27:

p. 278, § 1.

CSA:

C. 44, § 70.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-65.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-65.

30-5-166. San Miguel and Ouray - names changed.

The name of the county of Uncompahgre is hereby changed to Ouray, and the name of Ouray county is hereby changed to San Miguel county.

Source:

L. 1883:

p. 123, § 1.

G.S.

§ 483.

R.S. 08:

§ 1144.

C.L.

§ 8628.

CSA:

C. 44, § 71.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-66.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-66.

30-5-167. Sedgwick.

Beginning at the northeast corner boundary of Colorado; thence west on the north boundary line of Colorado to its intersection with the west line of range forty-seven west; thence south on said range line to its intersection with the southern boundary of the northern half of township nine north; thence east on said southern boundary to the east boundary line of Colorado; and thence north on said boundary line to the place of beginning. Said public land survey lines are based upon the sixth principal meridian.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 340, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1145.

C.L.

§ 8629.

CSA:

C. 44, § 72.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-67.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-67.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1433, § 20, effective July 1.

30-5-168. Summit.

Summit county: All that portion of the state bounded on the south by the county of Lake, and on the east by the summit of the snowy range, and on the north and west by the state boundary.

Source:

R.S.

p. 162, § 37.

G.L.

§ 369.

G.S.

§ 444.

R.S. 08:

§ 1146.

C.L.

§ 8630.

CSA:

C. 44, § 73.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-68.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-68.

30-5-169. Teller.

So much of the counties of El Paso and Fremont as is included within the following described boundaries shall be set apart and is hereby established as a county, to be called the county of Teller:

Beginning at the northeast corner of Fremont county at the intersection of the line between ranges sixty-seven and sixty-eight west of the sixth principal meridian, with the line between townships fifteen and sixteen south; thence north on the line between ranges sixty-seven and sixty-eight, seven miles, more or less, to the corner common to sections thirty and thirty-one, township fourteen south, range sixty-seven west, and sections twenty-five and thirty-six, township fourteen south of range sixty-eight west; thence westerly along section lines seven miles, more or less, to the corner common to sections twenty-five, twenty-six, thirty-five and thirty-six, in township fourteen south, range sixty-nine west; thence north on section lines, five miles, more or less, to the corner common to sections one and two, township fourteen south, range sixty-nine west, and sections thirty-five and thirty-six, township thirteen south, range sixty-nine west; thence east two miles along township line to corner common to sections five and six, township fourteen south, range sixty-eight west, and sections thirty-one and thirty-two, township thirteen south, range sixty-eight west; thence north along section lines eighteen miles, more or less, to the north section corner common to sections five and six, township eleven south, range sixty-eight west; thence west along the south boundary line of Douglas county sixteen miles, more or less, to the northwest corner of section three, township eleven south, range seventy-one west, being a point in the easterly boundary line of the county of Park; thence south along the easterly boundary line of Park county thirty miles, more or less, to the line between townships fifteen and sixteen south, being a point on the north boundary line of the county of Fremont; thence east along the north boundary line of Fremont county five miles, more or less, to the northeast corner of section five, township sixteen south, range seventy west; thence south along section lines three miles, more or less, to the corner common to sections sixteen and seventeen, twenty and twenty-one of township sixteen south of range seventy west; thence east along section lines, sixteen miles, more or less, to line between ranges sixty-seven and sixty-eight west; thence north on said range line, three miles, more or less, to the place of beginning.

Source:

L. 1899:

p. 359, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1147.

C.L.

§ 8631.

CSA:

C. 44, 74.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-69.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-69.

30-5-170. Washington.

The county of Washington is hereby established, with the same legal capacity and functions as other counties of this state, and the boundaries are as follows:

Beginning at the southeast corner of Weld county, and running thence west along the south boundary of Weld county to a point at the west line of range fifty-four west of the sixth principal meridian; thence north along the west line of said range fifty-four to a point on said range line at the north line of township five, north of range fifty-four west; thence east along said north line of township five north, and continuing on said course direct to a point on the east boundary line of the state, and of said Weld county; thence south along the east boundary line of the state and Weld county to the place of beginning.

There is hereby stricken from the county of Adams, formerly a part of the county of Arapahoe, and annexed to the county of Washington, all that territory now a part of Adams county, formerly a part of Arapahoe county, described as follows:

Beginning at the intersection of the east boundary line of range forty-nine west and the north boundary line of Adams county; thence west along the north boundary line of said Adams county to the east boundary line of range fifty-seven west; thence south along said line to the south boundary line of said Adams county; thence east along the southern boundary of said Adams county to the east boundary line of range forty-nine west; thence north along said line to the place of beginning.

Source:

L. 1887:

p. 251, § 1.

L. 03:

p. 169, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§§ 1148, 1149.

C.L.

§§ 8632, 8633.

CSA:

C. 44, §§ 75, 76.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-70.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-70.

30-5-171. Weld.

Except for those portions that became part of the city and county of Broomfield on November 15, 2001, in accordance with sections 10 to 13 of article XX of the state constitution, beginning at the intersection of the west line of range sixty-eight west with the base line; thence north on said range line to its intersection with the north line of township four north; thence east on said township line to its intersection with the west line of range sixty-seven west; thence north on said range line to its intersection with the north boundary line of Colorado; thence east along said north boundary line to its intersection with the west line of range fifty-five west; thence south on said range line to the southeast corner of township nine north, range fifty-six west; thence west on the south line of said township and range to the northeast corner of township eight north, range fifty-six west; thence south on the west line of range fifty-five west to its intersection with the north line of township six north; thence west on said township line to its intersection with the west line of range sixty west; thence south on said range line to the southeast corner of township five north, range sixty-one west; thence west on the south line of said township and range to the northeast corner of township four north, range sixty-one west; thence south on the east line of range sixty-one west to its intersection with the base line; and thence west on the base line to the place of beginning. Said public land survey lines are based upon the sixth principal meridian.

Source:

R.S.

p. 160, § 21.

G.L.

§ 361.

G.S.

§ 436.

R.S. 08:

§ 1150.

C.L.

§ 8634.

CSA:

C. 44, § 77.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-71.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-71.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1433, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 640, § 5, effective April 23.

30-5-172. Yuma.

The county of Yuma is hereby established, with the same legal capacities and functions as other counties of this state, and the boundaries are as follows:

Beginning at the northeast corner of Washington county; thence running west along the north line of Washington county to the range line between ranges forty-eight and forty-nine west of the sixth principal meridian, in said Washington county; thence south along said range line to the south line of Washington county; thence east along said south line of Washington county to the southeast corner of Washington county; thence north along the east line of said Washington county to the place of beginning.

There is hereby stricken from the county of Adams, formerly a part of Arapahoe county, and annexed to the county of Yuma, all that territory now a part of Adams county described as follows:

Beginning at the northeast corner of Adams county, thence west along the north boundary of said county to the range line dividing ranges forty-eight and forty-nine west; thence along said range line to the south boundary of said county; thence east along the south boundary of said county to the southeast corner of said county; thence north along the eastern boundary of said county to the place of beginning.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 476, § 1.

L. 03:

p. 173, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§§ 1151, 1152.

C.L.

§§ 8635, 8636.

CSA:

C. 44, §§ 78, 79.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-72.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-72.